District of Columbia statutes.
15-522

Docketing of claim; manner of trial.

The case made by the claim referred to in section 15-521 shall be entered on the docket as an action by the claimant or the defendant against the plaintiff and tried in the same manner as other cases before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 530, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(8)(A)(i)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-522.
1973 Ed., § 15-522.